zh-TW: 包括咖啡/茶具: 咖啡壺; 奶精; 杯子; 茶碟; 舀; 糖罐; 茶壺; 茶匙; 托盤; 其他
fi: Mukana kahvi-/teesetin tuotteet: Kahvipannu; Kahvimaito; Kupit; Asetit; Kauha; Sokeriastia; Teekannu; Teelusikat; Tarjotin; Muu
fr: Service à café/thé inclus: Dosette de café; Crémier; Verres en plastique; Soucoupes; Louche; Sucriers; Théière; Cuillères à café; Plateau; Autre
es: Piezas de juego de café/té incluidas: Cafetera; Jarrita para la leche; Tazas; Platillos; Cuchara; Azucarera; Tetera; Cucharillas de té; Bandeja; Otros
bg-BG: Включени са части от комплекти за кафе/чай: Чаша за кафе; Лъжичка; Чаши; Чинийки; Черпак; Захарница; Чайник; Чаени лъжички; Тава; Други
en: Coffee/Tea set pieces included: Coffee pot; Creamer; Cups; Saucers; Scoop; Sugar bowl; Teapot; Teaspoons; Tray; Other
de: Inbegriffene Kaffee-/Teeserviceteile: Kaffeekanne; Milchkännchen; Tassen; Untertassen; Dosierlöffel; Zuckerdose; Teekanne; Teelöffel; Tablett; Sonstiges
nb: Kaffe-/tesettdeler inkludert: Kaffekanne; Fløtekoker; Kopper; Underfat; Øse; Sukkerbolle; Tekanne; Teskjeer; Brett; Annet
th: ชิ้นส่วนชุดชา/กาแฟที่รวมอยู่: หม้อต้มกาแฟ; ครีมเทียม; ถ้วย; จานรอง; ที่ตัก; ถ้วยใส่น้ำตาล; กาน้ำชา; ช้อนชา; ถาด; อื่นๆ
ru: Состав кофейного или чайного сервиза: Кофейник; Кувшин для сливок; Чашки; Блюдца; Лопатка; Сахарница; Чайник; Чайные ложки; Поднос; Другое
el: Περιλαμβάνονται σετ για καφέ/τσάι: Κανάτα καφέ; Κανατάκι; Κούπες; Πιατάκια; Σέσουλα καφέ; Ζαχαριέρα; Τσαγιέρα; Κουταλάκια του τσαγιού; Δίσκος; Άλλο
zh-CN: 包括咖啡/茶具: 咖啡壶; 奶精; 杯子; 茶托; 勺子; 糖罐; 茶壶; 茶匙; 托盘; 其他
hu: A tartalmazott kávé-/teakészlet: Kávéskanna; Tejkiöntő; Csészék; Csészealjak; Kanál; Cukortartó; Teáskanna; Teáskanalak; Tálca; Egyéb
ro-RO: Set de cafea/ceai inclus: Ibric de cafea; Cană pentru smântână; Cănițe; Farfurioare; Lingură; Bol pentru zahăr; Ceainic; Lingurițe; Tavă; Altele
sk-SK: Produkty kávovej/čajovej súpravy v cene: Kanvica na kávu; Krémovač; Poháre; Podšálky; Naberačka; Cukornička; Čajník; Čajové lyžičky; Podnos; Iné
sv: Kaffe-/teservis ingår: Kaffekanna; Gräddkanna; Koppar; Fat; Skopa; Sockerskål; Tekanna; Teskedar; Bricka; Övrigt
da: Kaffe/te-sæt medfølger: Kaffekande; Flødekande; Kopper; Underkopper; Ske; Sukkerskål; Tekande; Teskeer; Bakke; Andet
ja: コーヒー・紅茶セットの内容: コーヒーポット; クリーマー; カップ; ソーサー; スクープ; シュガーボウル; ティーポット; ティースプーン; トレイ; その他
ko: 커피/차 세트 포함: 커피 포트; 크리머; 컵; 받침 접시; 국자; 설탕 그릇; 찻주전자; 티스푼; 트레이; 기타
pl: W zestawie elementy zestawu do kawy/herbaty: Dzbanek na kawę; Śmietanka; Kubki; Spodki; Łyżka; Cukiernica; Czajniczek; Łyżeczki do herbaty; Tacka; Inne
hr-HR: Artikli uključeni u servisa za kavu/čaj: Posuda za pripremu kave; Vrhnje za kavu; Šalice; Tanjurići; Žličica; Posuda za šećer; Čajnik; Žličice; Pladanj; Ostalo
pt-PT: Peças de conjunto de café/chá incluídos: Cafeteira; Leiteira; Copos; Pires; Colher; Açucareiro; Bule; Colheres de chá; Bandeja; Outro
sl-SI: Priloženi deli kompleta za kavo/čaj: Lonček za kavo; Smetana za kavo; Skodelice; Krožniki; Merica; Sladkornica; Čajnik; Čajne žličke; Pladenj; Drugo
tr: Kahve/Çay seti parçaları dahil: Cezve; Krema; Kupalar; Altlıklar; Kepçe; Şekerlik; Demlik; Çay kaşığı; Tepsi; Diğer
it: Pezzi del set da caffè/tè inclusi: Caffettiera; Lattiera; Tazze; Piattini; Paletta; Zuccheriera; Teiera; Cucchiaini da tè; Vassoio; Altro
lt-LT: Komplekte esantys kavos / arbatos servizo rinkiniai: Kavos puodelis; Ąsotėlis grietinėlei; Puodeliai; Lėkštės; Samtelis; Cukrinė; Arbatinukas; Arbatiniai šaukšteliai; Padėklas; Kita
cs: Složení kávového/čajového setu: Konvice na kávu; Smetana do kávy; Šálky; Podšálky; Lopatka; Cukřenka; Konvice na čaj; Čajové lžičky; Podnos; Jiné
vi: Bao gồm bộ đồ uống trà/cà phê: Phin cà phê; Bột kem; Cúp; Đĩa nhỏ đựng chén; Thìa; Hũ đựng đường; Ấm trà; Thìa cà phê; Khay; Khác
nl: Inclusief koffie/theeservies: Koffiepot; Creamer; Bekers; Schoteltjes; Schep; Suikerpotje; Theepot; Theelepels; Dienblad; Andere
pt-BR: Conjunto de café/chá incluído: Pote de café; Creme; Copos; Pires; Colher; Açucareiro; Bule; Colheres de chá; Bandeja; Outro